utilities/dictionaries/eu_EU-Basque.aff
FLAG num
SFX 398 0 entxoon .
SFX 398 0 entxoontzat .
SFX 398 0 entxootaz .
SFX 398 0 entxooz .
SFX 398 0 entxora .
SFX 398 0 entxoraino .
SFX 398 0 entxorantz .
SFX 398 0 entxorat .
SFX 398 0 entxorekin .
SFX 398 0 entxoren .
SFX 398 0 entxorendako .
SFX 398 0 entxorentzat .
SFX 398 0 entxori .
SFX 398 0 entxorik .
SFX 398 0 entxotik .
SFX 398 0 entxotzat .
SFX 398 0 entxoz .
SFX 48 Y 1
SFX 48 0 tako .
SFX 49 Y 20
SFX 49 0 0 .
SFX 49 0 ek .
SFX 49 0 ekin .
SFX 49 0 eki/1,370 .
SFX 49 0 en .
SFX 49 0 endako .
SFX 49 0 entzat .
SFX 49 0 entza/1,370 .
SFX 49 0 en/1,371 .
SFX 49 0 ez .
SFX 49 0 ez/1,370 .
SFX 49 0 gan .
SFX 49 0 gana .
SFX 49 0 gana/1,370 .
SFX 49 0 gandik .
SFX 49 0 gandi/1,370 .
SFX 49 0 gatik .
SFX 49 0 gati/1,370 .
SFX 49 0 i .
SFX 49 0 ik .
SFX 46 Y 11
SFX 46 0 0 .
SFX 46 0 gan .
SFX 46 0 gana .
SFX 46 0 gana/1,370 .
SFX 46 0 gandik .
SFX 46 0 gandi/1,370 .
SFX 46 0 gatik .
SFX 46 0 gati/1,370 .
SFX 46 0 taz .
SFX 46 0 tzat .
SFX 46 0 tza/1,370 .
SFX 47 Y 30
SFX 47 0 0 .
SFX 47 0 ek .
SFX 47 0 ekin .
SFX 47 0 eki/1,370 .
SFX 47 0 eko .
SFX 47 0 eko/1,378 .
SFX 47 0 en .
SFX 47 0 endako .
SFX 47 0 entzat .
SFX 47 0 entza/1,370 .
SFX 47 0 en/1,371 .
SFX 47 0 era .
SFX 47 0 eraino .
SFX 47 0 eraino/1,370 .
SFX 47 0 erantz .
SFX 47 0 erantz/1,380 .
SFX 47 0 eranz/1,370 .
SFX 47 0 erat .
SFX 47 0 era/1,381 .
SFX 47 0 er/1,383 .
SFX 47 0 etik .
SFX 47 0 eti/1,370 .
SFX 47 0 ez .
SFX 47 0 ez/1,370 .
SFX 47 0 e/1,382 .
SFX 47 0 gatik .
SFX 47 0 gati/1,370 .
SFX 47 0 i .
SFX 47 0 ik .
SFX 47 0 i/1,370 .
SFX 44 Y 8
SFX 44 0 ko .
SFX 44 0 koa .
SFX 44 0 koak .
SFX 44 0 koa/1,377 .
SFX 44 0 ko/1,378 .
SFX 44 0 tako .
SFX 44 0 tik .
SFX 44 0 ti/1,370 .
SFX 45 Y 12
SFX 45 0 ek .
SFX 45 0 ekin .
SFX 45 0 eki/1,370 .
SFX 45 0 en .
SFX 45 0 endako .
SFX 45 0 entzat .
SFX 45 0 entza/1,370 .
SFX 45 0 en/1,371 .
SFX 45 0 ez .
SFX 45 0 ez/1,370 .
SFX 45 0 i .
SFX 45 0 ik .
SFX 42 Y 47
SFX 42 0 0 .
SFX 42 0 gan .
SFX 42 0 gana .
SFX 42 0 gana/1,370 .
SFX 42 0 gandik .
SFX 42 0 gandi/1,370 .
SFX 42 0 gatik .
SFX 42 0 gati/1,370 .
SFX 42 0 k .
SFX 42 0 ko .
SFX 42 0 koa .
SFX 42 0 koak .
SFX 42 0 koa/1,377 .
SFX 42 0 ko/1,378 .
SFX 42 0 n .
SFX 42 0 ra .
SFX 42 0 raino .
SFX 42 0 raino/1,370 .
SFX 42 0 rantz .
SFX 42 0 rantz/1,380 .
SFX 42 0 ranz/1,370 .
SFX 42 0 rat .
SFX 42 0 ra/1,381 .
SFX 42 0 rekin .
SFX 42 0 reki/1,370 .
SFX 42 0 ren .
SFX 42 0 rendako .
SFX 42 0 rentzat .
SFX 42 0 rentza/1,370 .
SFX 42 0 ren/1,371 .
SFX 42 0 re/1,382 .
SFX 42 0 ri .
SFX 42 0 rik .
SFX 42 0 riko .
SFX 42 0 rikoa .
SFX 42 0 rikoak .
SFX 42 0 rikoa/1,377 .
SFX 42 0 riko/1,378 .
SFX 42 0 r/1,383 .
SFX 42 0 tako .
SFX 42 0 taz .
SFX 42 0 tik .
SFX 42 0 ti/1,370 .
SFX 42 0 tzat .
SFX 42 0 tza/1,370 .
SFX 42 0 z .
SFX 42 0 z/1,370 .
SFX 43 Y 39
SFX 43 0 0 .
SFX 43 0 a .
SFX 43 0 aino .
SFX 43 0 aino/1,370 .
SFX 43 0 antz .
SFX 43 0 antz/1,380 .
SFX 43 0 anz/1,370 .
SFX 43 0 at .
SFX 43 0 a/1,381 .
SFX 43 0 ek .
SFX 43 0 ekin .
SFX 43 0 eki/1,370 .
SFX 43 0 eko .
SFX 43 0 eko/1,378 .
SFX 43 0 en .
SFX 43 0 endako .
SFX 43 0 entzat .
SFX 43 0 entza/1,370 .
SFX 43 0 en/1,371 .
SFX 43 0 era .
SFX 43 0 eraino .
SFX 43 0 eraino/1,370 .
SFX 43 0 erantz .
SFX 43 0 erantz/1,380 .
SFX 43 0 eranz/1,370 .
SFX 43 0 erat .
SFX 43 0 era/1,381 .
SFX 43 0 er/1,383 .
SFX 43 0 etik .
SFX 43 0 eti/1,370 .
SFX 43 0 ez .
SFX 43 0 ez/1,370 .
SFX 43 0 e/1,382 .
SFX 43 0 gatik .
SFX 43 0 gati/1,370 .
SFX 43 0 i .
SFX 43 0 ik .
SFX 43 0 i/1,370 .
SFX 43 0 r/1,383 .
SFX 40 Y 31
SFX 40 0 0 .
SFX 40 0 ek .
SFX 40 0 ekin .
SFX 40 0 eki/1,370 .
SFX 40 0 eko .
SFX 40 0 eko/1,378 .
SFX 40 0 en .
SFX 40 0 endako .
SFX 40 0 entzat .
SFX 40 0 entza/1,370 .
SFX 40 0 en/1,371 .
SFX 40 0 era .
SFX 40 0 eraino .
SFX 40 0 eraino/1,370 .
SFX 40 0 erantz .
SFX 40 0 erantz/1,380 .
SFX 40 0 eranz/1,370 .
SFX 40 0 erat .
SFX 40 0 era/1,381 .
SFX 40 0 er/1,383 .
SFX 40 0 etik .
SFX 40 0 eti/1,370 .
SFX 40 0 ez .
SFX 40 0 ez/1,370 .
SFX 40 0 e/1,382 .
SFX 40 0 gatik .
SFX 40 0 gati/1,370 .
SFX 40 0 i .
SFX 40 0 ik .
SFX 40 0 i/1,370 .
SFX 40 0 tako .
SFX 41 Y 29
SFX 41 0 0 .
SFX 41 0 a .
SFX 41 0 ak .
SFX 41 0 an .
SFX 41 0 arekin .
SFX 41 0 areki/1,370 .
SFX 41 0 aren .
SFX 41 0 arendako .
SFX 41 0 arentzat .
SFX 41 0 arentza/1,370 .
SFX 41 0 aren/1,371 .
SFX 41 0 ari .
SFX 41 0 az .
SFX 41 0 ko .
SFX 41 0 koa .
SFX 41 0 koak .
SFX 41 0 koa/1,377 .
SFX 41 0 ko/1,378 .
SFX 41 0 ra .
SFX 41 0 raino .
SFX 41 0 raino/1,370 .
SFX 41 0 rantz .
SFX 41 0 rantz/1,380 .
SFX 41 0 ranz/1,370 .
SFX 41 0 rat .
SFX 41 0 ra/1,381 .
SFX 41 0 r/1,383 .
SFX 41 0 tik .
SFX 41 0 ti/1,370 .
SFX 5 Y 22
SFX 5 0 0 .
SFX 5 0 dura .
SFX 5 0 dura/1,359 .
SFX 5 0 dur/1,360 .
SFX 5 0 garri .
SFX 5 0 garri/1,361 .
SFX 5 0 men .
SFX 5 0 mendu .
SFX 5 0 mendu/1,362 .
SFX 5 0 men/1,363 .
SFX 5 0 pen .
SFX 5 0 pen/1,363 .
SFX 5 0 tu .
SFX 5 0 tu/1,365 .
SFX 5 0 tzaile .
SFX 5 0 tzaile/1,366 .
SFX 5 0 tze .
SFX 5 0 tzear .
SFX 5 0 tzeke .
SFX 5 0 tzen .
SFX 5 0 tzen/1,367 .
SFX 5 0 tze/1,368 .
