utilities/dictionaries/eu_EU-Basque.dic
ñirñir/1002,5,1
Abe./41,1
Abu./41,1
Agirre/42,1
Agoitz/43,1
Agoiz/44,1
Ainhoa/42,1
Aitor/46,1
Aitzorrotz/43,1
Aitzorroz/44,1
Aizpuru/42,1
Al-Hufuf/40,1
Albisturr/45,1
Albistur/46,1
Albret/47,1
Albre/48,1
Alcibar/46,1
Aldatz/43,1
Aldaz/44,1
Allotz/43,1
Alloz/44,1
Almodovarr/45,1
Almodovar/46,1
Aloña/42,1
Amador/46,1
Amaiurr/45,1
Amed/40,1
Amnok/47,1
Amno/48,1
Amor/46,1
Amunarritz/43,1
Amunarriz/44,1
Anaitz/49,1
Anerr/45,1
Anotz/43,1
Anoz/44,1
Antipater/46,1
Apert/49,1
Apgarr/45,1
Aragas/44,1
Aragats/43,1
Aranatz/43,1
Aranaz/44,1
Arana/42,1
Arantzazu/42,1
Arantza/42,1
Aratz/43,1
Arbaiz/44,1
Arbelaitz/43,1
Arberatz/49,1
Ardanatz/43,1
Ardanaz/44,1
Argiñaritz/43,1
Argiñariz/44,1
Arkhangelsk/47,1
Arkhangels/48,1
Arnalt/49,1
Arraitz/43,1
Arraiz/44,1
Arrate/42,1
Arrauntz/43,1
Arraunz/44,1
Arriaga/42,1
Arriano/42,1
Arrieta/42,1
Arriola/42,1
Arrizabalaga/42,1
Arronitz/43,1
Arrosa/42,1
Arruiz/44,1
Artaitz/43,1
Artazkoz/44,1
Artur/46,1
Arzak/49,1
Arzotz/43,1
Asgabat/47,1
Asgaba/48,1
Astiz/44,1
Atetz/43,1
Auch/40,1
Auerr/45,1
Auriz/44,1
Aurtitz/43,1
Aviv/40,1
Axular/46,1
Aza./41,1
Azkarate/42,1
Azov/40,1
Azoz/44,1
Azpirotz/43,1
Baalbe/48,1
Babruisk/47,1
Babruis/48,1
Baerr/45,1
Baltasar/46,1
Bana/48,1
Bandung/40,1
Bank/47,1
Ban/48,1
Barak/49,1
Barens/44,1
Basauntz/43,1
Basongaiz/44,1
Battambang/40,1
Beñat/49,1
Begoña/42,1
Benedict/49,1
Beraitz/43,1
Berezibarr/45,1
Bering/40,1
Bernat/49,1
Beroiz/44,1
Bessemer/46,1
Bezkitz/43,1
Biarriz/44,1
Bidania-Goiatz/43,1
Bidart/47,1
Bidar/48,1
Bidderr/45,1
Bilintx/49,1
Biot/49,1
Biurrun-Olkoz/44,1
Bizirik/47,1
Biziri/48,1
Bohr/46,1
Boronat/49,1
Boulevard/40,1
Brecht/49,1
Brunnerr/45,1
Brunswick/47,1
Brunswic/48,1
Buchner/46,1
Bug/40,1
Burlat/47,1
Burla/48,1
Cancerr/45,1
Carnot/49,1
Carolina/42,1
Cesar/46,1
Cherbourg/40,1
Club/40,1
Connacht/47,1
Connach/48,1
Cortazarr/45,1
Cowper/46,1
Creutzfeldt/49,1
Cuvierr/45,1
Damavand/40,1
Daria/42,1
Detroit/47,1
Detroi/48,1
Dezhniov/40,1
Dobrix/44,1
Dogger/46,1
Donets/43,1
Dopplerr/45,1
Drakensberg/40,1
Eñaut/49,1
Ecevit/47,1
Eder/46,1
Edinburgh/40,1
Egia/42,1
Egibarr/45,1
Eguaras/44,1
Eila/48,1
Einsenmenger/46,1
Ekaitz/49,1
Eka./41,1
Eleonorr/45,1
Elixabet/49,1
Elkano/42,1
Elorz/44,1
Enderitz/43,1
Engler/46,1
Eparoz/44,1
Erlantz/49,1
Escobarr/45,1
Esnoz/44,1
Espotz/43,1
Etxalatz/43,1
Etxalaz/44,1
Etzakit/47,1
Euler/46,1
Eurosta/48,1
Explorerr/45,1
Ezkirotz/43,1
Ezkiroz/44,1
Facebook/47,1
Faisalabad/40,1
Fallot/49,1
Fermat/49,1
Ferra/48,1
Fischer/46,1
Fisherr/45,1
Fomalhaut/47,1
Fornjo/48,1
Fourier/46,1
Franswurst/49,1
Frenet/49,1
Friedländerr/45,1
Galartza/42,1
Garate/42,1
Gard/40,1
Garikoitz/49,1
Gaspar/46,1
Gaucherr/45,1
Gdansk/47,1
Geminida/48,1
Geretz/43,1
Gerrikaiz/44,1
Gilbert/49,1
Goñi/42,1
Goldaratz/43,1
Gopher/46,1
Gorno-Altaisk/47,1
Gorraiz/44,1
Goteborg/40,1
Graetz/49,1
Grea/48,1
Growerr/45,1
Guangdong/40,1
Guyot/49,1
Hadramaut/47,1
Hainau/48,1
Halytx/43,1
Hamburg/40,1
Harriet/49,1
Hauber/46,1
Hektorr/45,1
Helena/42,1
Helmand/40,1
Helmholtz/49,1
Henrik/49,1
Hockett/49,1
Hohhot/47,1
Horner/46,1
Hufuf/40,1
Humbold/48,1
Iciarr/45,1
Iharnoz/44,1
Ilarratz/43,1
Ilurdoz/44,1
Imotz/43,1
Ioritz/49,1
Irati/42,1
Ira./41,1
Iribar/46,1
Irizarr/45,1
Irkutsk/47,1
Iroz/44,1
Irtish/40,1
Isaak/49,1
Itsaso/42,1
Iturriotz/43,1
Itxiar/46,1
Itziarr/45,1
Izni/48,1
Jaiz/44,1
Jakutsk/47,1
Jalabert/49,1
Janaritz/43,1
Jauregi/42,1
Javierr/45,1
Javier/46,1
Jiaodong/40,1
Judit/49,1
Kaliningrad/40,1
Kant/49,1
Kapule/48,1
Kartagenerr/45,1
Kastor/46,1
Kattegat/47,1
Kermanxah/40,1
Khabarovs/48,1
Khanty-Mansisk/47,1
Kiev/40,1
Kintana/42,1
Kirku/48,1
Kitlineq/40,1
Kits/44,1
Kohelet/49,1
Kong/40,1
Kopet/47,1
Kortazarr/45,1
Krasnovods/48,1
Krementxuk/47,1
Kupffer/46,1
Labri/48,1
Lakarra/42,1
Lambrecht/49,1
Landerr/45,1
Langmuir/46,1
Languedoc/40,1
Lantz/43,1
Lasa/42,1
Leire/42,1
Leizoz/44,1
Leonorr/45,1
Leorlats/43,1
Lerruz/44,1
Lete/42,1
Liher/46,1
Likert/49,1
Lipetsk/47,1
Liq/40,1
Lorentz/49,1
Luhansk/47,1
Luhans/48,1
Luziferr/45,1
Lüneburg/40,1
Madariaga/42,1
Madotz/43,1
Maestrat/47,1
Maestra/48,1
Maider/46,1
Mai./41,1
Mamurr/45,1
Mantzizidor/46,1
Marina/42,1
Massif/40,1
Maurizio/42,1
Mayorr/45,1
Mediterraneo/41,1
Meissner/46,1
Melkisedek/49,1
Mendieta/42,1
Mendizorroz/44,1
Meotz/43,1
Mercatorr/45,1
Minsk/47,1
Mins/48,1
Mohr/46,1
Molina/42,1
Molotoff/40,1
Monserrat/49,1
Moussierr/45,1
Mozart/49,1
Muez/44,1
Munarritz/43,1
Murua/42,1
Müller/46,1
Médoc/40,1
Naltxik/47,1
Naltxi/48,1
Napierr/45,1
Navier/46,1
Neagh/40,1
Neptuno/42,1
Nestorr/45,1
Nets/43,1
Niemann-Pick/49,1
Novokuznes/48,1
Novokuznetsk/47,1
Nunavut/47,1
Nunavu/48,1
Obeid/40,1
Oderiz/44,1
Oier/46,1
Olabarrieta/42,1
Olaitz/43,1
Olarra/42,1
Olondriz/44,1
Omarr/45,1
Omsk/47,1
Oms/48,1
Ongotz/43,1
Orderiz/44,1
Orondritz/43,1
Osgood-Schlatter/46,1
Oslerr/45,1
Osteriz/44,1
Ozkaritz/43,1
Paaliaq/40,1
Paget/49,1
Pagola/42,1
Pazifiko/41,1
Pecquet/49,1
Peltier/46,1
Pernik/47,1
Perni/48,1
Peru/42,1
Peugeot/47,1
Peugeo/48,1
Pfeifferr/45,1
Pickwick/49,1
Pinochet/49,1
Pioneer/46,1
Pittsburgh/40,1
Planck/49,1
Pleses/48,1
Plesetsk/47,1
Precodorr/45,1
Pripiat/47,1
Pripia/48,1
Purbeck/49,1
Qinling/40,1
Quartet/47,1
Quarte/48,1
Reap/40,1
Reaumur/46,1
Remo/42,1
Renault/47,1
Renaul/48,1
Rendu-Osler-Weberr/45,1
Rio/42,1
Ritter/46,1
Ross/40,1
Saigos/44,1
Saint-Brieuc/40,1
Saint/47,1
Sain/48,1
Salazarr/45,1
Santiago/42,1
Satrustegi/42,1
Savart/49,1
Saxonia-Anhalt/47,1
Saxonia-Anhal/48,1
Schlatter/46,1
Schüllerr/45,1
Seeger/46,1
Sendzimirr/45,1
Senideak-Gureak/47,1
Senideak-Gurea/48,1
Shandong/40,1
Skalariak/47,1
Skalaria/48,1
Snedecor/46,1
Soltxaga/42,1
Steinerr/45,1
Stormont/47,1
Stormon/48,1
Sudeck/49,1
Sud/40,1
Superbat/47,1
Superba/48,1
Tamanrasset/47,1
Tamanrasse/48,1
Tejedor/46,1
Thayerr/45,1
Tinduf/40,1
Tipulatz/43,1
Tobruk/47,1
Tobru/48,1
Türkmenabat/47,1
Türkmenaba/48,1
UDR/40,1
Udalaiz/44,1
Ugarte/42,1
Urdaitz/43,1
Urdax/44,1
Urdotz/43,1
Uribe/42,1
Urizar/46,1
Uroz/44,1
Urrutia/42,1
Usenet/49,1
Usotz/43,1
Utrecht/47,1
Utrech/48,1
Uzhhorod/40,1
Uztarroz/44,1
Vernerr/45,1
Viktor/46,1
Villarr/45,1
Vitsebsk/47,1
Vitsebs/48,1
Waldeyer/46,1
Wechslerr/45,1
Weymouth/40,1
Wight/47,1
Wigh/48,1
Yazd/40,1
Zaldaitz/43,1
Zarimuz/44,1
Zelaia/42,1
Zenotz/43,1
Zerener/46,1
Zesarr/45,1
Zildoz/44,1
Zurich/40,1
Zutik/47,1
Zuti/48,1
agor/1002,5,1
aitor/1002,5,1
alfer/1002,5,1
arabiar/1002,5,1
azar/1002,5,1
bakar/1002,5,1
bazter/1002,5,1
beldur/1002,5,1
betekor/1002,5,1
bilur/1002,5,1
bizkor/1002,5,1
desager/1002,5,1
desuger/1002,5,1
egonkor/1002,5,1
eliztar/1002,5,1
eltzar/1002,5,1
endur/1002,5,1
esker/1002,5,1
ezegonkor/1002,5,1
gailur/1002,5,1
gazur/1002,5,1
gizatiar/1002,5,1
gogor/1002,5,1
gotor/1002,5,1
harabar/1002,5,1
haur/1002,5,1
hezur/1002,5,1
hitzar/1002,5,1
ikarakor/1002,5,1
indar/1002,5,1
iruzur/1002,5,1
izpor/1002,5,1
jeloskor/1002,5,1
kanpotar/1002,5,1
kizkur/1002,5,1
lahar/1002,5,1
lehor/1002,5,1
lotsakor/1002,5,1
maltzur/1002,5,1
maskur/1002,5,1
moxkor/1002,5,1
negar/1002,5,1
onar/1002,5,1
partzuer/1002,5,1
sar/1002,5,1
sugar/1002,5,1
txantxar/1002,5,1
txokar/1002,5,1
uztar/1002,5,1
zekor/1002,5,1
zohar/1002,5,1
